Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 13. State Control of Certain Land.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Ballot Measure No. 5 is unconstitutional because it is in direct conflict with the disclaimer provisions of §§ 12 and 13, art. XII, of the state constitution, and as a result, neither the Department of Natural Resources nor any other public agencies (e.g., the Department of Public Safety, etc.) should attempt to implement its provisions. 1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 2.

Ballot Measure No. 5 probably is unconstitutional under provisions of the United States Constitution. 1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 2.

Any state claim to ownership of public lands under the “equal footing” doctrine, which insures that new states are admitted to the Union with the same sovereign political rights and powers as all other states, faces substantial legal obstacles since it has never guaranteed economic equality through equalization of land grants. 1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 2.

The argument that federal ownership of public lands within a state may constitute an interference with state sovereignty to the extent that it violates rights of the states under the
10th amendment of the United States Constitution may not be successful in defense of Ballot Measure No. 5 or a similar measure.
1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 2.

The breadth of the claim to ownership and management of federal lands in Alaska in Ballot Measure No. 5 is a problem since, under the definition of land in the measure, there is no exception for federal buildings (e.g., post offices, schools, hospitals, etc.), other specifically recognized federal property (e.g., the Alaska Railroad, including its right-of-way and improvements), Alaska Native Allotments, and Alaska Native Townsite lots. 1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 2.

The election pamphlet materials describing Ballot Measure No. 5 to the voters were incomplete in that the definition of lands and the criminal penalties were not included. 1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 2.

Sec. 38.05.500.
Electorate determinations.

The people of the State of Alaska determine that:

the intent of the framers of the Constitution of the United States was to guarantee to each of the states sovereignty over all matters within its boundaries except for those powers specifically granted to the United States as agent of the states;

the attempted imposition upon the State of Alaska by the Congress of the United States of a requirement in the Statehood Act that the State of Alaska and its people “disclaim all right and title to any land or other property not granted or confirmed to the state or its political subdivisions by or under the authority of this Act, the right or title to which is held by the United States or is subject to disposition by the United States,” as a condition precedent to acceptance of Alaska into the Union, was an act beyond the power of the Congress of the United States and is thus void;

the purported right of ownership and control of the public land in the State of Alaska by the United States is without foundation and violates the clear intent of the Constitution of the United States; and

the exercise of that dominion and control of the public land in the State of Alaska by the United States works a severe, continuous and debilitating hardship upon the people of the State of Alaska.

History.

(1982 Initiative Proposal No. 5, § 1)

Sec. 38.05.501.
Management.

The Department of Natural Resources shall manage the land which is the subject of AS

38.05.500

—

38.05.505

. The department will use the provisions of this chapter for the management of the land except to the extent that the provisions of AS

38.05.500

—

38.05.505

provide to the contrary.

The department shall manage the land in an orderly and beneficial manner.

The department may adopt regulations for the management of the land. No regulation which imposes a limitation upon the people of the state is effective until approved by the legislature.

The department may sell, lease, exchange, or encumber the land when specifically authorized to do so by law and under the terms and conditions established by the law.

History.

(1982 Initiative Proposal No. 5, § 1)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 38.05.510. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 38.05.502.
Property of the people.

Subject to valid existing rights of applicants for land, upon February 21, 1983, all land in the state and all minerals not previously appropriated are the exclusive property of the people of the state and the state holds title to the land and minerals in trust for the people of the state.

History.

(1982 Initiative Proposal No. 5, § 1)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 38.05.520. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 38.05.503.
Treaties and compacts.

Land in the state which has been administered by the United States under international treaties and interstate compacts will continue to be administered by the state in conformity with those treaties and compacts.

History.

(1982 Initiative Proposal No. 5, § 1)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 38.05.540. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 38.05.504.
Proceeds to the general fund.

The proceeds of sales, fees, rents, royalties or other receipts from the land paid to the state under the provisions of AS

38.05.500

—

38.05.505

shall be deposited in the general fund, and the legislature may provide for payments in lieu of taxes to local governments.

History.

(1982 Initiative Proposal No. 5, § 1)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

38.05.560

. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 38.05.505.
Exclusive enforcement.

The state has exclusive jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of AS

38.05.500

—

38.05.505

.

An individual may institute a civil action to recover damages for injury or loss sustained as the result of a violation of the provisions of AS

38.05.500

—

38.05.505

or for the failure of the state to enforce its trust responsibilities to the people of the state.

History.

(1982 Initiative Proposal No. 5, § 1)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 38.05.570. Renumbered in 1983.

Cited

in

McCavit v. Lacher, 447 P.3d 726 (Alaska 2019).